Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.020

Criminal mistreatment in the first degree.

(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or dependent person, a person who has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life is guilty of criminal mistreatment in the first degree if he or she with criminal negligence, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, causes great bodily harm to a child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities of life.

(2) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2017 c 266 s 2; 2006 c 228 s 2; 1997 c 392 s 510; 1986 c 250 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2017 c 266: "The legislature finds that seniors and people with disabilities face a growing threat of financial exploitation and physical neglect. The legislature intends with this act to hold accountable those perpetrators who commit theft and physical neglect of seniors and people with disabilities by increasing penalties, reducing barriers to prosecution, and expanding the scope of protection for vulnerable persons." [ 2017 c 266 s 1.]

Short title—Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Part headings and captions not law—1997 c 392: See notes following RCW 74.39A.009.